Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-409
Effect of settlement and release; offset; joint and several liability; right of contribution.

(1) A plaintiff's settlement and release of one defendant in an action under the Minor Alcoholic Liquor Liability Act does not bar claims against any other defendant.

(2) The amount paid to a plaintiff in consideration for the settlement and release of a defendant in an action under the act shall be offset against all other subsequent judgments awarded to the plaintiff.

(3) The retailer, licensee, social host, person procuring alcoholic liquor for a minor, and minor who are defendants in an action brought under the act are jointly and severally liable in such action as provided in section 25-21,185.10 for those who act in concert to cause harm.

(4) In an action based on the act, the retailer, licensee, social host, person procuring alcoholic liquor for a minor, and minor shall have a right of contribution and not a right of subrogation from one another.

Laws 2007, LB573, § 9.